California, session 20252026, AB41.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 39601.6 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:39601.6. (a) Before adopting or amending a regulation that imposes costs on gasoline refiners, distributors, or retailers, the state board, in consultation with the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, shall make available to the public, including on its internet website, an estimate of the impact on retail gasoline prices due to either of the following.(1) The proposed new regulation.(2) The existing regulation and the proposed amendments to that regulation.(b) An estimate prepared pursuant to this section shall include a maximum estimated impact on retail gasoline prices that assumes the maximum possible cost imposed under the regulation on refiners, distributors, or retailers, and that all costs are passed on to consumers.